Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.163

Furlough—Notice—Temporary restraining order.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Before a person committed under this chapter is permitted temporarily to leave a treatment facility for any period of time without constant accompaniment by facility staff, the superintendent, professional person in charge of a treatment facility, or his or her professional designee shall in writing notify the prosecuting attorney of any county to which the person is released and the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the criminal charges against the committed person were dismissed, of the decision conditionally to release the person. The notice shall be provided at least forty-five days before the anticipated release and shall describe the conditions under which the release is to occur.

(2) In addition to the notice required by subsection (1) of this section, the superintendent of each state institution designated for the custody, care, and treatment of persons committed under this chapter shall notify appropriate law enforcement agencies through the state patrol communications network of the furloughs of persons committed under RCW 10.77.086 or 10.77.110. Notification shall be made at least thirty days before the furlough, and shall include the name of the person, the place to which the person has permission to go, and the dates and times during which the person will be on furlough.

(3) Upon receiving notice that a person committed under this chapter is being temporarily released under subsection (1) of this section, the prosecuting attorney may seek a temporary restraining order to prevent the release of the person on the grounds that the person is dangerous to self or others.

(4) The notice requirements contained in this section shall not apply to emergency medical furloughs.

(5) The existence of the notice requirements contained in this section shall not require any extension of the release date in the event the release plan changes after notification.

(6) The notice provisions of this section are in addition to those provided in RCW 10.77.205.

[ 2008 c 213 s 4; 1994 c 129 s 4; 1990 c 3 s 106; 1989 c 420 s 9; 1983 c 122 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1994 c 129: See note following RCW 4.24.550.